Nevada, session 83, AB55.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. NRS 484C.170 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
484C.170 1. Any coroner, or other public official performing
like duties, shall in all cases in which a death has occurred as a
result of a crash involving a motor vehicle, whether the person
killed is a driver, passenger or pedestrian, cause to be drawn from
each decedent [, within 8 hours of the crash,] a blood sample to be
analyzed for the presence and concentration of alcohol [.] and
substances which are commonly misused, as determined by the
coroner or other public official.
2. The findings of the examinations are a matter of public
record and must be reported to the Department by the coroner or
other public official [within 30 days after the death.] upon receipt of
the findings.
3. [Blood-alcohol] Blood sample analyses for the presence
and concentration of alcohol and substances which are commonly
misused are acceptable only if made by laboratories licensed to
perform this function.
Sec. 2. NRS 484E.110 is hereby amended to read as follows:
484E.110 1. Every police officer who investigates a vehicle
crash of which a report must be made as required in this chapter, or
who otherwise prepares a written or electronic report as a result of
an investigation either at the time of and at the scene of the crash or
thereafter by interviewing the participants or witnesses, shall
[forward a written or electronic] submit the report of the crash to the
Department of Public Safety through the electronic crash reporting
system maintained by the Department of Public Safety within 10
days after [the investigation] :
(a) The date of the crash [.] ; or
(b) The date of death of a person involved in the crash if the
death occurred as a result of the crash.
2. The data collected by the Department of Public Safety
pursuant to [this] subsection 1 must be recorded in a central
repository created and maintained by the Department of Public
Safety , in collaboration with the Department of Transportation, to
track data electronically concerning vehicle crashes on a statewide
basis.
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 3 –
[2.] 3. The [written or electronic] reports required to be
[forwarded] submitted by police officers and the information
contained therein are not privileged or confidential.
[3.] 4. Every sheriff, chief of police or office of the Nevada
Highway Patrol receiving any report required under NRS 484E.030
to 484E.090, inclusive, shall immediately [prepare] file a copy
thereof [and file the copy] with the Department of Public Safety.
[4.] 5. If a police officer investigates a vehicle crash resulting
in bodily injury to or the death of any person or total damage to any
vehicle or item of property to an apparent extent of $750 or more,
the police officer shall prepare a [written or electronic] report of the
investigation.
[5.] 6. As soon as practicable after receiving a report pursuant
to this section, the Department of Public Safety shall [submit]
transmit a copy of the report to the Department of Motor Vehicles.
Sec. 3. NRS 484E.120 is hereby amended to read as follows:
484E.120 1. The Department of Public Safety shall [prepare
forms] prescribe the form for crash reports required pursuant to
NRS 484E.110, which must be suitable with respect to the persons
required to make the reports and the purposes to be served. The
[forms] form must be designed to call for sufficiently detailed
information to disclose with reference to a crash the cause,
conditions then existing, the persons and vehicles involved, the
name and address of the insurance company, the number of the
policy providing coverage and the dates on which the coverage
begins and ends. The Department of Public Safety shall [, upon
request, supply] make available to a police department, sheriff or
other appropriate agency or person the [forms] form for crash
reports prepared by a police officer pursuant to NRS 484E.110.
2. In addition to submitting a copy of a report pursuant to NRS
484E.110, the Department of Public Safety shall provide any
information required by this section which is not included in
the report to the Department of Motor Vehicles to enable the
Department of Motor Vehicles to determine whether the
requirements for the deposit of security under chapter 485 of NRS
are inapplicable. The Department of Motor Vehicles may rely upon
the accuracy of information supplied to a police officer by a driver
or owner on the form unless it has reason to believe that the
information is erroneous.
3. Every crash report required pursuant to NRS 484E.070 must
be made on the appropriate form approved by the Department of
Motor Vehicles pursuant to that section and must contain all the
information required in the form.
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 4 –
4. Every crash report required pursuant to NRS 484E.110 must
be made on the appropriate form approved by the Department of
Public Safety and must contain all the information required therein
unless it is not available.
Sec. 4. This act becomes effective on July 1, 2025.
20 ~~~~~ 25
-
83rd Session (2025)